Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.184

Terms and conditions from negotiations initiated by franchisee.

This chapter does not preclude negotiation of the terms and conditions of a franchise at the initiative of the franchisee, provided that such negotiated terms and conditions do not violate any provision of this chapter. After the initial offer to a franchisee using the disclosure document required by RCW 19.100.030, 19.100.040, or 19.100.070 a franchisor need not provide an amended disclosure document to that franchisee by reason of a change in the terms and conditions of a franchise being negotiated at the initiative of that franchisee or amend the registration by reason of such change.

[ 2012 c 121 s 8; 1991 c 226 s 12.]